Indiana, session 2026, HB1163.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 33-39-7-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) This section applies to state fiscal years
beginning after June 30, 2026.
(b) Each state fiscal year, the monthly benefit payable under this
chapter to a participant shall be increased by the percentage
increase in the Consumer Price Index, if any, as calculated under
IC 36-8-8-15. The increase under this subsection may not exceed
three percent (3%).
(c) The increase described in subsection (b) shall be applied to
the monthly benefit (including any previous increases to the
monthly benefit received under this section or under any other
provision) beginning with the July payment.
2026 IN 1163—LS 6512/DI 153